Missouri, session 2026, HB2212.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 620, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 620.4000, to read as follows:
620.4000. 1. There is hereby established within the division of tourism within the
department of economic development the "U.S. Grant Heritage Area", to be managed
and administered by the director of tourism in accordance with this section.
2. (1) The U.S. Grant heritage area shall consist of the following counties:
(a) Tier one counties shall be Audrain, Bollinger, Callaway, Cape Girardeau,
Cole, Franklin, Gasconade, Iron, Jefferson, Madison, Marion, Mississippi, Monroe,
Montgomery, New Madrid, Perry, Pike, Ralls, Scott, Shelby, St. Francois, Ste.
Genevieve, Stoddard, Warren, and Washington; and
(b) Tier two counties shall be St. Charles County, St. Louis County, and the city
of St. Louis.
(2) There shall be no distinction in the administration of the heritage area
between tier one and tier two counties, except that the division of tourism may
distinguish between such tiers in the percentage of funding allowed, provided that the
same percentage shall apply to all counties of the same tier. The division of tourism shall
not allow the grant of appropriated public funds to exceed fifty percent of total funds
received from all sources for tier one counties and twenty-five percent of total funds
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2212 2
received from all sources for tier two counties for any purpose authorized by this section
or by a management plan approved under subsection 6 of this section.
3. (1) The Missouri humanities council and the National U.S. Grant Trail
Association, Missouri chapter, shall administer the provisions of this section, subject to a
division of responsibilities adopted by rule by the division of tourism.
(2) The provisions of this section shall be subject to appropriation and such
appropriation shall be to the division of tourism or directly to the Missouri humanities
council.
4. (1) Subject to appropriation, the Missouri humanities council shall dedicate a
staff member who will oversee the preparation of a management plan as required by
subsection 6 of this section, and who shall be responsible for coordinating outreach to
county and municipal governments, agencies, nonprofit organizations, and civic groups
within the boundaries of the heritage area, until such time as the management plan has
been presented to the director of tourism.
(2) Subject to appropriation, the division of tourism shall establish a committee
to advise the division and to further facilitate outreach to included counties. The
committee shall be composed of eleven members selected as follows:
(a) The executive director of the Missouri humanities council or his or her
designee;
(b) The executive director of the state historical society of Missouri or his or her
designee;
(c) The executive director of the state historical society of Missouri or his or her
designee;
(d) The chair of the National U.S. Grant Trail Association, Missouri chapter, or
his or her designee; and
(e) Residents of the following Missouri senate districts, appointed by the director
of the division of tourism: 03, 06, 10, 18, 25, 26, and 27.
5. The division of state parks, the state historic preservation office, the Missouri
state library and the records and archives division of the office of the secretary of state,
and the department of conservation shall cooperate with the division of tourism in the
development and administration of the management plan.
6. Within two years of the date of appropriation of funds to develop the
management plan, the Missouri humanities council and the National U.S. Grant Trail
Association, Missouri chapter, shall submit to the director of tourism a proposed
management plan for the heritage area. The management plan for the heritage area
shall include the following elements:

HB 2212 3
(1) Comprehensive policies, goals, strategies, and recommendations for telling
the story of the heritage of the region and encouraging long-term resource protection,
enhancement, interpretation, funding, management, and development of the heritage
area;
(2) Consideration for existing state, county, and local plans in the development
and implementation of the management plan;
(3) A description of actions and commitments that governments, private
organizations, and citizens plan to take to protect, enhance, and interpret the cultural,
historical, archaeological, natural, and recreational resources of the heritage area;
(4) Existing and potential sources of funding or economic development strategies
to protect, enhance, interpret, fund, manage, and develop the heritage area;
(5) An inventory of the cultural, historical, archaeological, natural, and
recreational resources of the heritage area relating to the stories and themes of the
region that should be protected, enhanced, managed, or developed;
(6) Policies and strategies for resource management, including the development
of intergovernmental and interagency agreements to protect the natural, historic,
cultural, educational, scenic, and recreational resources of the heritage area;
(7) A program for implementation of the management plan, including:
(a) Performance goals;
(b) Plans for resource protection, enhancement, and interpretation; and
(c) Specific commitments for implementation that have been made by the
Missouri humanities council; the National U.S. Grant Trail Association, Missouri
chapter; or any government, organization, business, or individual;
(8) Analysis of, and recommendations for, ways in which federal, state, tribal,
and local programs may best be coordinated, including the role of the National Park
Service and other federal agencies associated with the heritage area, to further the
purposes of this section;
(9) An interpretive plan for the heritage area; and
(10) A business plan that:
(a) Describes the role, operation, financing, and functions of the local
coordinating entity and of each of the major activities described in the management
plan; and
(b) Provides adequate assurances that the local coordinating entity has the
partnerships and financial and other resources necessary to implement the management
plan for the heritage area.
7. (1) In determining whether to approve a management plan for the heritage
area, the director of tourism shall consider:

HB 2212 4
(a) The diverse interests of the heritage area, including federal government
liaisons; state, tribal, and local governments; natural and historical resource protection
organizations; educational, business, and recreational organizations; community
residents; and private property owners;
(b) If there is adequate opportunity for public and federal, state, tribal, and local
governmental involvement in the preparation of the management plan and the plan
provides for at least semiannual public meetings to ensure adequate implementation of
the management plan;
(c) If resource protection, enhancement, interpretation, funding, management,
and development strategies described in the management plan would adequately
100 protect, enhance, interpret, fund, manage, and develop the natural, historical, cultural,
101 educational, scenic, and recreational resources of the heritage area;
102 (d) Demonstration of financial capability to carry out the plan;
103 (e) Assurances of support from state, tribal, and local officials; and
104 (f) Demonstrated partnerships between federal, state, tribal, and local
105 governments; regional planning organizations; nonprofit organizations; or private
106 sector entities to aid in implementation of the management plan.
107 (2) If the director of tourism disapproves of the management plan, he or she:
108 (a) Shall advise the Missouri humanities council and the National U.S. Grant
109 Trail Association, Missouri chapter, in writing of the reasons for the disapproval; and
110 (b) May make recommendations for revisions to the management plan.
111 (3) Upon receipt of the revised management plan, the director of tourism shall
112 approve or disapprove the plan within one hundred eighty days.
✔